sl-SI: Združljivost tipov plošč: Bodyboard; Foil deska; Longboard; SUP-deska (Stand-up paddleboard); Surf deska; Wing deska; Drugo
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของประเภทบอร์ด: บอดี้บอร์ด; ฟอยล์บอร์ด; ลองบอร์ด; สแตนด์อัพแพดเดิลบอร์ด (SUP); เซิร์ฟบอร์ด; วิงบอร์ด; อื่นๆ
vi: Khả năng tương thích với loại ván: Ván trượt sóng (Bodyboard); Ván cánh ngầm; Ván dài; Ván chèo đứng (SUP); Ván lướt sóng; Ván buồm; Khác
es: Compatibilidad de tipo de tabla: Bodyboard; Tabla foil; Longboard; Surf de remo (SUP); Tabla de surf; Tabla wing; Otro
zh-CN: 适配板型: 趴板; 水翼板; 长板; 站立式桨板 (SUP); 冲浪板; 风翼板; 其他
sv: Kompatibel med bräda: Bodyboard; Foilbräda; Longboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Surfbräda; Wingbräda; Annan
tr: Board tipi uyumluluğu: Bodyboard; Foil board; Longboard; Kürek sörfü tahtası (SUP); Sörf tahtası; Wing board; Diğer
nl: Compatibiliteit boardtype: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Longboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Surfboard; Wingboard; Overige
bg-BG: Съвместимост с типа на дъската: Бодиборд; Фойлборд; Лонгборд; Стендъп падълборд (SUP); Сърфборд; Уингборд; Друго
pl: Kompatybilność typu deski: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Longboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Deska surfingowa; Wingboard; Inne
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost vrste daske: Bodyboard; Foil daska; Longboard; Daska za uspravno veslanje (SUP); Daska za surfanje; Wing daska; Ostalo
fr: Type de planche compatible: Bodyboard; Planche de foil; Longboard; Stand-up paddle (SUP); Planche de surf; Planche de wing; Autre
en: Board type compatibility: Bodyboard; Foil board; Longboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Surfboard; Wing board; Other
fi: Lautatyypin yhteensopivuus: Bodyboard; Foilboard-lauta; Longboard-lauta; SUP-lauta (Stand-up paddleboard); Surffilauta; Wingboard-lauta; Muu
pt-BR: Compatibilidade do tipo da prancha: Bodyboard; Prancha de foil; Longboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Prancha de surfe; Prancha de wing; Outros
ko: 보드 유형 호환성: 바디보드; 포일보드; 롱보드; 스탠드업 패들보드(SUP); 서프보드; 윙보드; 기타
lt-LT: Plokščių tipų suderinamumas: Kūno lentoms; Lentoms su povandeniniu sparnu; Ilgosioms lentoms; Irklentėms (SUP); Banglentėms; Sparnuotosioms lentoms; Kitas
da: Kompatibilitet med brættype: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Longboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Surfbræt; Wingboard; Andet
ja: ボードタイプの互換性: ボディボード; フォイルボード; ロングボード; スタンドアップパドルボード（SUP）; サーフボード; ウィングボード; その他
it: Compatibilità del tipo di scheda: Bodyboard; Foil board; Longboard; Stand up paddle (SUP); Tavola da surf; Wing board; Altro
sk-SK: Kompatibilita typov dosiek: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Longboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Surf; Wingboard; Iné
el: Συμβατότητα τύπου σανίδας: Bodyboard; Foil board; Longboard; Ιστιοσανίδα όρθιας κωπηλασίας (SUP); Σανίδα του σερφ; Wing board; Άλλο
cs: Kompatibilita typů desek: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Longboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Surfovací prkno; Wingboard; Jiné
zh-TW: 板子類型相容性: 趴板; 水翼板; 長板; 立式划槳板 (SUP); 衝浪板; 風翼板; 其他
de: Kompatibilität des Boardtyps: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Longboard; Stand-Up-Paddleboard (SUP); Surfboard; Wingboard; Sonstige
pt-PT: Compatibilidade do tipo de placa: Bodyboard; Prancha de foil; Longboard; Stand-up paddle (SUP); Prancha de surf; Prancha de wing; Outro
hu: Deszkatípus-kompatibilitás: Bodyboard; Foil deszka; Longboard; Állószörf (SUP); Szörfdeszka; Wing deszka; Egyéb
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea tipului de placă: Bodyboard; Placă cu foil; Longboard; Placă stand-up paddle (SUP); Placă de surf; Placă pentru wing; Altele
nb: Kompatibilitet med korttyper: Bodyboard; Foilbrett; Longboard; Ståpadlebrett (SUP); Surfebrett; Vingebrett; Annet
ru: Совместимость типов досок: Бодиборд; Фойлборд; Лонгборд; Сапборд (SUP); Сёрфборд; Вингборд; Другое